Utah statutes.
53-2a-506.   Privileges and immunities of emergency responders.

(1)  Any emergency responder from another state who enters into this state while responding to an emergency has the same authority to act, including providing care, as does any emergency responder of this state.

(2)  All privileges and immunities from liability, exemption from law, ordinances, and rules, and any other benefits, which apply to an emergency responder while performing duties in the responder's state of residence or state of employment as a responder, apply when the emergency responder is acting as an emergency responder in Utah.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

